Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 1 General Provisions as to Civil Actions
§ 1-1-109.
Comparative fault.

As used in this section:

“Actor” means a person or other entity, including the claimant, whose fault is determined to be a proximate cause of the death, injury or damage, whether or not the actor is a party to the litigation;

“Claimant” means a natural person, including the personal representative of a deceased person, or any legal entity, including corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships or unincorporated associations, and includes a third party plaintiff and a counterclaiming defendant;

“Defendant” means a party to the litigation against whom a claim for damages is asserted, and includes third party defendants. Where there is a counterclaim, the claimant against whom the counterclaim is asserted is also a defendant;

“Fault” includes acts or omissions, determined to be a proximate cause of death or injury to person or property, that are in any measure negligent, or that subject an actor to strict tort or strict products liability, and includes breach of warranty, assumption of risk and misuse or alteration of a product;

“Injury to person or property,” in addition to bodily injury, includes, without limitation, loss of enjoyment of life, emotional distress, pain and suffering, disfigurement, physical or mental disability, loss of earnings or income, damage to reputation, loss of consortium, loss of profits and all other such claims and causes of action arising out of the fault of an actor;

“Wrongful death” means that cause of action authorized by Wyoming statute to recover money damages when the death of a person is caused by the fault of an actor such as would have entitled the party injured to maintain an action to recover damages if death had not ensued.

Contributory fault shall not bar a recovery in an action by any claimant or the claimant’s legal representative to recover damages for wrongful death or injury to person or property, if the contributory fault of the claimant is not more than fifty percent (50%) of the total fault of all actors. Any damages allowed shall be diminished in proportion to the amount of fault attributed to the claimant.

Whether or not the claimant is free of fault, the court shall:

If a jury trial:

Direct the jury to determine the total amount of damages sustained by the claimant without regard to the percentage of fault attributed to the claimant, and the percentage of fault attributable to each actor; and

Inform the jury of the consequences of its determination of the percentage of fault.

If a trial before the court without jury, make special findings of fact, determining the total amount of damages sustained by the claimant without regard to the percentage of fault attributed to the claimant, and the percentage of fault attributable to each actor.

The court shall reduce the amount of damages determined under subsection (c) of this section in proportion to the percentage of fault attributed to the claimant and enter judgment against each defendant in the amount determined under subsection (e) of this section.

Each defendant is liable only to the extent of that defendant’s proportion of the total fault determined under paragraph (c)(i) or (ii) of this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 28, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-7.2; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1986, ch. 24, § 1; 1994, ch. 98, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Many of the following annotations are taken from cases decided prior to the 1986 amendment of this section and the repeal of §§

1-1-110

through 1-1-113.

Inapplicable to restitution. —

Where defendant pled no contest to aggravated assault and battery, the district court did not err by ordering him to pay $63,428.29 in restitution to the victim under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-9-102

because defendant admitted at sentencing that the victim’s medical bills were valid and stemmed from the treatment he received following the assault and battery. Absent clear language in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-1-109

demonstrating the legislature intended a victim’s fault to be compared to the conduct of an intentional tortfeasor, the district court did not abuse its discretion by failing to consider the assault victim’s fault in determining the amount of restitution. Cave v. State, 2022 WY 30, 505 P.3d 191,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2022).

Negligence on part of fraud victim. —

It seems clear the legislature sought to ensure negligent defendants would not be held accountable for the intentional acts of another, and the Wyoming Supreme Court is not persuaded the legislature intended negligence on the part of a fraud victim to be compared with the intentional acts of the perpetrator so as to reduce the perpetrator's liability based upon any percentage of fault apportioned to the victim. Erdelyi v. Lott, 2014 WY 48, 326 P.3d 165,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2014).

Absent clear statutory language showing the legislature intended the negligence of a fraud victim to be compared to the conduct of the perpetrator, thereby potentially reducing the latter's liability for his intentionally wrongful acts, the court declines to hold that the statute is a proper matter for a jury instruction in a fraud case. Erdelyi v. Lott, 2014 WY 48, 326 P.3d 165,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2014).

District court erred in instructing on comparative fault and negligence so as to allow the jury to compare the stockbroker's willful act with any negligence of the client in this constructive fraud case, and the district court further erred in providing a verdict form requiring the jury to compare the stockbroker's constructive fraud and any negligence of the client. Erdelyi v. Lott, 2014 WY 48, 326 P.3d 165,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2014).

If a jury finds that a claimant knew or could have discovered the fraud more than four years before filing the action, the perpetrator of the fraud is relieved from any liability, and thus any negligence of the claimant in not discovering and timely pursuing a fraud claim is addressed in the statute, and there is no need for a separate instruction allowing a jury to compare a claimant's negligence or comparative fault with the willful act of the perpetrator in a fraud case; on remand, the jury was not to be instructed on comparative fault as between the client and the stockbroker. Erdelyi v. Lott, 2014 WY 48, 326 P.3d 165,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2014).

Law applied prior to June 11, 1986. —

The supreme court continued the law of Board of County Comm'rs v. Ridenour, 623 P.2d 1174,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo. 1981) and Kirby Bldg. Sys. v. Mineral Explorations Co., 704 P.2d 1266,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 521

(Wyo. 1985) during the period before the 1986 amendment to this section and repeal of §§

1-1-110

through 1-1-113 took effect (June 11, 1986). Burton v. Fisher Controls Co., 723 P.2d 1214,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 596

(Wyo. 1986).

Contractual remedies not precluded. —

The provisions of this statute relating to contribution among joint tortfeasors does not inhibit the contractual remedies. Remedies for breach of contract and breach of express and implied warranty which arise under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code may still be asserted. Centric Corp. v. Drake Bldg. Corp., 726 P.2d 1047,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 628

(Wyo. 1986) (decided under former §

1-1-110

).

Although plaintiff negligent, warranty action not precluded.
—

This section does not require that recovery in a warranty action be precluded where the jury finds that the plaintiff was contributorily negligent. Sheldon v. Unit Rig & Equipment Co., 797 F.2d 883, 1986 U.S. App. LEXIS 27470 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1986), cert. denied, 479 U.S. 1090, 107 S. Ct. 1300, 94 L. Ed. 2d 156, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 734 (U.S. 1987).

Section not applicable to warranty, strict liability. —

The supreme court will not, in response to certified questions from a federal district court, engage in comprehensive judicial legislating in order to extend the application of this section from its express and intended arena of negligence into warranty and strict liability proceedings by either statutory interpretation or common-law extension. Phillips v. Duro-Last Roofing, 806 P.2d 834,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1991).

The decision in Phillips v. Duro-Last Roofing, Inc., 806 P.2d 834,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1991) makes it clear that a reduction of damages in proportion to plaintiff's fault is not appropriate in non-negligence causes of action based on strict liability. Zierke v. Agri-Systems, 992 F.2d 276,

1993 U.S. App. LEXIS 10185

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1993).

Subsection (d) should not be read in isolation to apply comparative fault to actions other than negligence but should be read in the context of the entire section to forbid its application altogether to actions premised on theories of strict liability or breach of warranty. Schneider Nat'l v. Holland Hitch Co., 843 P.2d 561,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1992).

Inapplicable to contract and fiduciary breach claims. —

This section does not bar plaintiff's recovery in a legal malpractice action based on claims for breach of contract and breach of fiduciary duty, even though the jury apportioned fault in the following manner: plaintiff, 35%; defendant, 35%; and a third party, 30%. Furthermore, neither this comparative negligence statute nor any other principle of Wyoming law requires that the plaintiff's recovery be reduced by his percentage of fault. Jackson State Bank v. King, 844 P.2d 1093,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1993), limited, Long-Russell v. Hampe, 2002 WY 16, 39 P.3d 1015,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2002), overruled in part, Dockter v. Lozano, 2020 WY 119, 472 P.3d 362,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2020).

Inapplicable to contract claim not involving personal injury
or property damage. —

Comparative fault under this section was inapplicable in a breach of contract action brought by a city against a contractor based on failure to provide motors that conformed to specifications.
Strong Constr., Inc. v. City of Torrington, 2011 WY 82, 255 P.3d 903,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2011).

Absolute defense of contributory negligence was abolished when legislature adopted comparative negligence statute.

Halpern v. Wheeldon, 890 P.2d 562,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1995).

Purpose of comparative negligence. —

The doctrine of comparative negligence is designed to ameliorate the harshness of the contributory negligence bar. Barnette v. Doyle, 622 P.2d 1349,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1981).

Comparative fault applied. —

Evidence was sufficient to support the finding by the jury of total damages of $150,000, and where the jury attributed 45% of the fault to plaintiff for her injuries, pursuant to the comparative fault statute, defendant's liability was reduced to 55% of the $ 150,000. Turcq v. Shanahan, 950 P.2d 47,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1997).

Judgment dismissing negligence action because under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-1-109(b) the plaintiff was more than 50 percent at fault was affirmed, and trial court properly allowed defendant to amend its admissions under W.R.C.P. 36. If the errant admission had been allowed to stand, it would have essentially decided the breach-of-duty element of the action. Permitting the parties to present evidence on the fault issue advanced the search for the truth and promoted a correct legal ruling. Hodges v. Lewis & Lewis, Inc., 2005 WY 134, 121 P.3d 138,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2005).

In a slip and fall case, court did not err in an instruction that defendants were all responsible for their own percentage of fault, because the jury determined plaintiff's fault to be sixty-five percent, and as long as his fault was greater than fifty percent, he was not entitled to recovery. Parrish v. Groathouse Constr., Inc., 2006 WY 33, 130 P.3d 502,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2006).

In a passenger's
personal injury suit against a driver, it was not error to admit
evidence
of the passenger's comparative fault or to instruct the
jury on comparative
fault because a jury could reasonably find the
passenger at fault
for not determining how drunk the driver was before
asking the driver
for a ride, since the passenger knew the driver
had likely been drinking
alcohol. Wise v. Ludlow, 2015 WY 43, 346 P.3d 1,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2015), reh'g denied,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. Apr. 7, 2015).

This section applies only in cases where plaintiff is contributorily negligent.

Palmeno v. Cashen, 627 P.2d 163,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1981).

Where the court ruled that there was no evidence of negligence on the part of the plaintiff that would justify the plaintiff's inclusion on the verdict form as an actor as to whom negligence could be attributed, there was no error in its failure to give an instruction pursuant to this section. Martinez v. City of Cheyenne, 791 P.2d 949,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1990), overruled, Beaulieu v. Florquist, 2004 WY 31, 86 P.3d 863,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2004).

Evidence of seat belt usage. —

Court found no inconsistency in the application of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-1402(f), which prohibits the introduction of evidence of seat belt nonuse, in light of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-1-109

; the legislature had the right to limit the application of comparative fault principles to negligence actions arising out of automobile accidents involving unbelted occupants. Huff v. Shumate, 360 F. Supp. 2d 1197, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 27781 (D. Wyo. 2004).

Learned intermediary doctrine. —

In a prescription drug user's product liability suit against the drug manufacturer, the court determined that the Wyoming comparative fault statute has no effect on the application of the learned intermediary doctrine. Thom v. Bristol-Myers Squibb Co., 353 F.3d 848, 2003 U.S. App. LEXIS 26105 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2003).

Section inapplicable to contractual recovery for legal malpractice.
—

Wyoming's comparative negligence statute did not bar plaintiff's recovery in a legal malpractice action based on claims for breach of contract and breach of fiduciary duty, nor did it require that plaintiff's recovery be reduced by his percentage of fault. Jackson State Bank v. King, 992 F.2d 256, 1993 U.S. App. LEXIS 9116 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1993).

As this section is based on the comparative negligence statute of Wisconsin, the construction given the Wisconsin statute by the highest court of that state at the time the Wyoming legislature enacted the statute is also presumed to have been adopted. Board of County Comm'rs v. Ridenour, 623 P.2d 1174,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 627 P.2d 163,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1981), overruled in part, ABC Builders v. Phillips, 632 P.2d 925,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1981).

But subsection (a) and §

1-1-114

cannot stand together. —

There is enough of a conflict between §

1-1-114

and subsection (a) of this section that the two cannot stand together. Johnson v. Safeway Stores, 568 P.2d 908,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1977).

Thus, subsection (a) is amended. —

The Wyoming legislature, in enacting §

1-1-114

, clearly intended for its provisions to apply to comparative negligence actions and amended subsection (a) to the extent that in such actions the jury shall be informed by the trial court on the effect of its percentage findings, as those findings affect the outcome of the case, and particularly the damage issue. Johnson v. Safeway Stores, 568 P.2d 908,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1977).

The legislature, by its enactment of §

1-1-114

, manifested a clear intendment for its provisions to apply without exception to all personal injury actions, including those cases brought by “any person or his legal representative to recover damages for negligence resulting in death or in injury to person or property.” Johnson v. Safeway Stores, 568 P.2d 908,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1977).

Emotional distress damages. —

Subsection (a) does not evidence an intent by the legislature to permit emotional distress damages in connection with an injury to property. Blagrove v. JB Mechanical, Inc., 934 P.2d 1273,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1997).

Section distinguished from “pure” form of comparative negligence
statute. —

This section is a “not as great as” form of comparative negligence statute (similar to an “equal to or greater than” form), as distinguished from the “pure” form, under which the plaintiff may recover part of his damages if defendant's negligence is established regardless of the percentage of his own contributory negligence, such percentage being used only to determine the amount by which plaintiff's damages are reduced. Danculovich v. Brown, 593 P.2d 187,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1979).

Effect of equal fault. —

Under this section a defendant who caused 50% of a loss pays nothing, and a plaintiff who was responsible for just 50% of his own damage recovers nothing. Jones v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 731 P.2d 29,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1987).

Effect of willful, wanton misconduct by defendant. —

This section does not mandate reduction of damages on the basis of comparative negligence of the plaintiff if defendant's misconduct is willful and wanton. Danculovich v. Brown, 593 P.2d 187,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1979); Barnette v. Doyle, 622 P.2d 1349,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1981).

Willful conduct. —

Pursuant to the statute, willful conduct must be compared with negligence. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bassett, 8 P.3d 1079,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2000).

In an action arising from an automobile accident which occurred when a fleeing suspect crashed into the plaintiffs' vehicle just after it cleared a roadblock set up to stop the fleeing suspect, the court erred in not including the fleeing suspect on the verdict form as an actor whose conduct would be compared by the jury in allocating fault. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bassett, 8 P.3d 1079,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2000).

Under case law, a joint tortfeasor who acts willfully is properly included as an actor on a verdict form in a negligence case so that the jury can compare the defendant's negligence and the non-party actor's willful conduct and apportion liability. Erdelyi v. Lott, 2014 WY 48, 326 P.3d 165,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2014).

Trial court errs in reducing damages for the intentional tort of outrageous conduct

on the basis of comparative negligence. Bell v. Mickelsen, 710 F.2d 611, 1983 U.S. App. LEXIS 29178 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1983).

Ordinary negligence of both parties compared before addressing
culpable negligence. —

When an action involves both ordinary negligence of the plaintiff and defendant and culpable negligence of the defendant, the jury must apportion the ordinary negligence of the parties before addressing the defendant's culpable negligence. Barnette v. Doyle, 622 P.2d 1349,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1981).

Assumption of risk is form of contributory negligence

in Wyoming. Cline v. Sawyer, 600 P.2d 725,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 458

(Wyo. 1979).

There is no distinction between the doctrines of assumption of the risk and contributory negligence. Barnette v. Doyle, 622 P.2d 1349,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1981).

Assumption of risk not absolute defense. —

Assumption of risk, as a form of contributory negligence, is not an absolute defense to a negligence action but is a basis for apportionment of fault. Brittain v. Booth, 601 P.2d 532,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 472

(Wyo. 1979); Barnette v. Doyle, 622 P.2d 1349,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1981); Walters v. Grand Teton Crest Outfitters, Inc., 804 F. Supp. 1442, 1992 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15892 (D. Wyo. 1992).

In examining finding of assumption of risk there must be found

substantial evidence from which a jury could find the existence of a risk or danger to one entering the site of the injury and from which it could find that a reasonable man of ordinary prudence would not take the risk or subject himself to the danger. Brittain v. Booth, 601 P.2d 532,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 472

(Wyo. 1979).

Last clear chance doctrine unnecessary. —

The apportionment of damages under this section makes unnecessary the doctrine of last clear chance. Danculovich v. Brown, 593 P.2d 187,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1979).

Mere use of an obviously dangerous product does not constitute negligence,

as a matter of law; in order for contributory negligence to be found, there must be evidence that care commensurate with the risks involved was not used. Caterpillar Tractor Co. v. Donahue, 674 P.2d 1276,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1983).

Negligence of all participants to be considered. —

In a comparative negligence case, the jury must consider the negligence of not only the parties but also of all the participants in the transaction which produced the injuries sued upon. Board of County Comm'rs v. Ridenour, 623 P.2d 1174,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 627 P.2d 163,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1981), overruled in part, ABC Builders v. Phillips, 632 P.2d 925,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1981).

Multiple plaintiffs or claims. —

Particular care should be taken when multiple plaintiffs or claims are present, so that only the negligence that proximately causes any particular injury is considered by the jury when apportioning fault as to that injury. Board of County Comm'rs v. Ridenour, 623 P.2d 1174,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 627 P.2d 163,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1981), overruled in part, ABC Builders v. Phillips, 632 P.2d 925,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1981).

In cases involving multiple defendants, plaintiff's negligence is compared with that of each individual defendant. If the plaintiff's negligence is greater than an individual defendant's negligence, there can be no recovery from that defendant. Board of County Comm'rs v. Ridenour, 623 P.2d 1174,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 627 P.2d 163,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1981), overruled in part, ABC Builders v. Phillips, 632 P.2d 925,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1981).

In a negligence action against multiple defendants, the plaintiff's percentage of fault, as ascertained by the jury, had to be converted to a dollar figure and subtracted from the verdict. The trial court then had to further reduce the verdict by the total dollar amount of all settlements as revealed in the settling instruments of all the settling tortfeasors. As there remained nonsettling tortfeasors, each of whose percentage of fault, as ascertained by the jury, exceeded that of the plaintiff, the plaintiff was allowed to proceed against all of these tortfeasors, jointly and severally, for the full amount of the judgment. Kirby Bldg. Sys. v. Mineral Explorations Co., 704 P.2d 1266,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 521

(Wyo. 1985).

Loss-of-consortium award to wife reduced by percentage of fault
attributed to husband. —

The common-law rule that a wife was not entitled to damages for loss of consortium had its genesis in a social, economic and political climate entirely foreign to Wyoming in 1986. Hence, a woman will no longer be denied a cause of action for loss of consortium. However, the trial court should reduce any award to the wife by the percentage of fault attributed to her husband, as a cause of action for loss of consortium is a derivative action, and the causal negligence of the injured spouse limits recovery of the claiming spouse under this section. Weaver v. Mitchell, 715 P.2d 1361,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 513

(Wyo. 1986).

When subsection (b) applicable. —

The request and the finding under subsection (c) are to be made only in connection with actions to recover damages for negligence resulting in death or in injury to person or property. Cline v. Sawyer, 600 P.2d 725,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 458

(Wyo. 1979).

Determination of damages and negligence required in jury trial.
—

The language in subsection (c)(ii) following “special findings of fact” was not intended to apply to paragraph (ii) only, but to apply equally to paragraphs (i) and (ii). Thus in a jury trial, as in a trial before the court without a jury, there must be a determination of the amount of damages and the percentage of negligence attributable to each party. Board of County Comm'rs v. Ridenour, 623 P.2d 1174,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 627 P.2d 163,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1981), overruled in part, ABC Builders v. Phillips, 632 P.2d 925,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1981); Tate v. Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co., 647 P.2d 58,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 348

(Wyo. 1982).

Error to give unsupported instruction. —

It is prejudicial error to give instructions on contributory negligence if the defense of such negligence is not supported by substantial evidence. The same rule would apply with respect to the negligence of a plaintiff in a comparative negligence context. Chrysler Corp. v. Todorovich, 580 P.2d 1123,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 1978).

But negligence usually question for jury. —

Ordinarily, the question of negligence in a collision involving leading and following vehicles is a question of fact for the jury, but the exception to that rule is recognized when the evidence is undisputed and subject to but one reasonable inference, or is legally insufficient to raise a question of fact for the jury. Chrysler Corp. v. Todorovich, 580 P.2d 1123,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 1978).

Duty to make the comparison of negligence as required by this section is for the fact finder if the evidence can result in a difference of opinion. Cline v. Sawyer, 618 P.2d 144,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1980).

The factual resolution of the degrees of negligence and contributory negligence belongs to the province of the jury, not the court. Ruhs v. Pacific Power & Light, 671 F.2d 1268, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 21320 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

Settlements disclosure not required. —

This section does not require the disclosure of settlements to satisfy the jury's understanding of the consequences of attributing fault under state comparative negligence law. Wardell v. McMillan, 844 P.2d 1052,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1992).

The phrase “consequences of its determination of the percentage of fault” in subsection (c)(i)(B) does not encompass informing the jury of the fact and amount of settlement with other entities no longer parties to the litigation. This statutory language requires only that the jury be told that if the plaintiff's percentage of negligence is more than 50%, the plaintiff will not recover, and that a defendant who is liable will only pay in proportion to his percentage of fault. Haderlie v. Sondgeroth, 866 P.2d 703,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1993).

Nor disclosure of immunity of decedent's employer. —

In a wrongful death action against an electric company, arising out of an electrocution of a highway worker, an instruction describing Wyoming's comparative fault scheme and alerting the jury that if it found the decedent over 50% at fault then the plaintiff would recover nothing, was adequate for compliance with subsection (c)(i)(B); there was no plain error in failing to inform the jury that the decedent's employer (the highway department) was immune from suit. Furman v. Rural Elec. Co., 869 P.2d 136,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1994).

Jury should be advised which actors have “available pockets.”
—

In view of subsection (b), it would seem that either through the verdict form or the statement of the issues the jury should be advised as to who among the actors had “available pockets” and who was included only for determination of the computation of responsibility. Burton v. Fisher Controls Co., 723 P.2d 1214,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 596

(Wyo. 1986).

But mistaken reference to actor as “defendant” in verdict form
not prejudicially confusing. —

In action for damages resulting from an accident, the use of “defendant” rather than “actor” in the verdict form to refer to parties who had settled or who otherwise were not actual litigants during the trial did not cause prejudicial confusion. Burton v. Fisher Controls Co., 723 P.2d 1214,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 596

(Wyo. 1986).

Defendant in default may assert failure of evidence. —

In hearing to determine damages following defendant's default, defendant could properly assert that no damages were caused by collision between his vehicle and plaintiff's; even though defaulted defendant was charged with one hundred percent of the fault, no recovery could be had if no damages were caused by his fault. Schaub v. Wilson, 969 P.2d 552,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1998).

Defendant in default must be permitted to address issue of
relative fault. —

The issue of fault, as distinguished from liability, is no longer separable from the issue of damages; the two are intertwined to the extent that one cannot defend on the issue of damages without being permitted to participate with respect to the issue of fault. The defendant in default must be permitted to participate in proceedings which address the issue of relative fault because it is a significant factor in any damage award. McGarvin-Moberly Constr. Co. v. Welden, 897 P.2d 1310,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1995).

Because, by our comparative negligence statute, the question of fault is inextricably intertwined with the amount of damages that may be awarded against any defendant, a defendant who makes an appearance after entry of default, but before default judgment could participate fully in the discovery process and on issues concerning proximate cause and damages. McGarvin-Moberly Constr. Co. v. Welden, 897 P.2d 1310,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1995).

Summary judgment is poor device for deciding questions of comparative negligence.

What is contemplated by the comparative negligence statute is that the totality of the causal negligence present in the case will be examined to determine the contribution each party has made to that whole. It is the “respective contributions to the result” which determine who is most negligent, and by how much. Connett v. Fremont County Sch. Dist., 581 P.2d 1097,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1978).

Recreation Safety Act limits provider's duty. —

The Recreation Safety Act, §§

1-1-121

to

1-1-123

, is intended to limit the duty which a provider owes to a participant, and is not affected by the adoption of this section. Halpern v. Wheeldon, 890 P.2d 562,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1995).

Law concerning duty to remove or warn of obvious or known danger
unchanged. —

Since the law of this state is to the effect that there is no duty to remove or warn of an obvious danger or one that is known to the person injured, no change was accomplished in that law by the adoption of comparative negligence. Sherman v. Platte County, 642 P.2d 787,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 321

(Wyo. 1982).

“Known and obvious danger” rule did not negate city's duty

to keep its streets and sidewalks in a reasonably safe condition and in reasonably good repair, but the obvious danger of the streets resulting from accumulations of loose gravel after resurfacing could be considered by the trier of fact to determine the plaintiff's percentage of negligence. O'Donnell v. Casper, 696 P.2d 1278,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 462

(Wyo. 1985) (but see Sherman v. Platte County, 642 P.2d 787,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 321

(Wyo. 1982), annotated above).

Liability resulting from accumulation of ice, snow. —

Absent the legislature's express intention to abrogate the natural accumulation and obvious-danger rules, the rules survive the adoption of comparative negligence. Therefore, the rule remains that an owner or occupier of premises will not be liable for injuries resulting from a slip and fall on a natural accumulation of ice and snow. Eiselein v. K-Mart, 868 P.2d 893,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1994).

An owner or occupier of premises owes a duty to prevent injuries resulting from an unnatural accumulation of ice which will be found if the owner or occupier creates an accumulation of water in a manner substantially different in volume or course than would naturally have occurred. Eiselein v. K-Mart, 868 P.2d 893,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1994).

Even the most ably constructed and carefully maintained parking lot will probably contain minor indentions in which naturally occurring water can accumulate and freeze. Naturally occurring water which naturally concentrates in such a lot is still considered a natural accumulation, for which the owner or occupier is not liable. Eiselein v. K-Mart, 868 P.2d 893,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1994).

Presumption against retrospective effect. —

There appears no language in this section to indicate it should apply retrospectively, and indeed, there exists a violent presumption that it will not. Fraley v. Worthington, 64 F.R.D. 726, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6180 (D. Wyo. 1974) (decided under former §

1-1-110

(right to contribution among tort feasors)).

Applicability of percentage-of-fault provisions. —

Subsection (d) (liability for percent of fault) does not apply to those causes of action accruing before June 11, 1986. Halliburton Co. v. McAdams, Roux & Assocs., 773 P.2d 153,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1989).

Subsections (b) through (d) come into play only if the case is tried by a jury or to the court and a party requests, or the court on its own makes, a determination of the percentage of fault attributable to each defendant. Melehes v. Wilson, 774 P.2d 573,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1989), reh'g denied,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. June 12, 1989).

Under 1986 version of statute, district court erred in requiring defendant to pay 100 percent of plaintiffs' damages, where plaintiffs were found to be free from negligence and defendant was determined to be only 50 percent at fault. Anderson Highway Signs & Supply, Inc. v. Close, 6 P.3d 123,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2000).

Indemnity available on strict liability and breach of warranty
grounds. —

This section, in the absence of an express contract of indemnity, provides negligent actors a right of indemnity against another actor who was liable for the third party's injuries on strict liability or breach of warranty grounds. Schneider Nat'l v. Holland Hitch Co., 843 P.2d 561,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1992).

New trial required. —

Erroneous instruction regarding comparative fault principles as applied to claims based on strict liability and breach of warranty, along with misleading closing remarks regarding apportionment, required a new trial where after the verdict was returned, certain questions regarding the applicability of this section were certified to the Wyoming supreme court. Phillips v. Duro-Last Roofing, Inc., 973 F.2d 869, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 19548 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1992).

Right of contribution is dependent upon existence of statute

and involves joint tortfeasors. Northern Utils. Div. of K N Energy v. Evansville, 822 P.2d 829,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1991) (decided under prior law).

Judgment entered without credit from settling defendants. —

A nonsettling defendant, found to be 100% at fault, was not entitled to credit the amount the plaintiff received from settling defendants against the judgment he had to pay. Credit need not be given, because the amount of judgment for which each defendant is liable is always limited by the percentage of fault assigned to that defendant. Haderlie v. Sondgeroth, 866 P.2d 703,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1993).

Where the jury found that defendant was ninety percent at fault,

if defendant were given credit for co-defendant's settlement, she would not be required to satisfy her full responsibility to the plaintiffs, and that result would not be consistent with this section or with the court's decision in Haderlie v. Sondgeroth, 866 P.2d 703,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1993).Rudy v. Bossard, 997 P.2d 480,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2000).

Contractor/subcontractor claims. —

In an action against a contractor for injuries to employees of its subcontractor arising from an accident during work on a construction project, the contractor had a viable contractual indemnity claim against the subcontractor which was not barred by application of the comparative fault statute. Diamond Surface v. Cleveland, 963 P.2d 996,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1998).

Legislature may change approach. —

While it is true that the legislature, in enacting Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-1-109

, generally espoused the comparative negligence approach for negligence actions, that is not to say that the legislature is precluded from subsequently limiting, or even rejecting altogether, the application of comparative negligence in negligence actions arising out of particular circumstances. Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. July 24, 2003).

Applied

in

Cervelli v. Graves, 661 P.2d 1032,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1983); Goggins v. Harwood, 704 P.2d 1282,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 526

(Wyo. 1985); Cities Serv. Co. v. Northern Prod. Co., 705 P.2d 321,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 543

(Wyo. 1985); Stroup v. Oedekoven, 995 P.2d 125,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1999).

Quoted

in

Martinez v. Union P. R. Co., 714 F.2d 1028,

1983 U.S. App. LEXIS 24763

(10th Cir. 1983); Harmon v. Town of Afton, 745 P.2d 889,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 543

(Wyo. 1987); Glenn v. Union Pac. R.R. Co., 2011 WY 126, 262 P.3d 177,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Sept. 9, 2011).

Stated

in

Lake v. D & L Langley Trucking, Inc., 2010 WY 75, 233 P.3d 589,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(June 9, 2010).

Cited

in

Sanders v. Pitner, 508 P.2d 602,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1973);
Hendrickson v. Heinze, 541 P.2d 1133,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1975);
Venes v. Heck, 642 F.2d 380,

1981 U.S. App. LEXIS 19846

(10th Cir. 1981);
Jones v. Chevron U.S.A., Inc., 718 P.2d 890,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 547

(Wyo. 1986);
Coryell v. Town of Pinedale, 745 P.2d 883,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 541

(Wyo. 1987);
Radosevich v. Board of County Comm'rs, 776 P.2d 747,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1989);
Seaton v. State Highway Comm'n, Dist. No. 1, 784 P.2d 197,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1989);
Horowitz v. Schneider Nat'l, Inc., 992 F.2d 279,

1993 U.S. App. LEXIS 10201

(10th Cir. 1993);
State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Colley, 871 P.2d 191,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1994);
Cooperman v. David, 214 F.3d 1162,

2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 11925

(10th Cir. 2000);
Beavis v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 2001 WY 32, 20 P.3d 508,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2001);
Beckwith v. Weber, 2012 WY 62, — P.3d —,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Apr. 25, 2012); Carson v. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2014 WY 42,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Mar 31, 2014).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Comparative Negligence in Wyoming,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 597 (1973).

See article, “Comparative Negligence Problems with the Special Verdict: Informing the Jury of the Legal Effects of Their Answers,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 199 (1975).

For article, “The Wyoming Uninsured Motorist Act: A Regulatory Reconciliation of Mandated Coverages with the Standard Uninsured Motorist Endorsement,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 213 (1976).

For comment, “Landowner Liability Under the Wyoming Recreational Use Statute,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 649 (1980).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — Constitutionality of Wyoming's Co-employee Immunity Statute under Article 10, Section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 355 (1983).

For case note, “Torts — Assumption of Risk and the Obvious Danger Rule. Primary or Secondary Assumption of Risk? Sherman v. Platte County, 642 P.2d 787,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 321

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 373 (1983).

For article, “Comparative Negligence and Strict Tort Liability — A Marriage of Necessity,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1983).

For comment, “Comparative Negligence Practice in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 713 (1983).

For case note, “Torts — The Obvious Danger Rule —
A Qualified Adoption of Secondary Assumption of Risk Analysis. O'Donnell v. City of Casper, 696 P.2d 1278,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 462

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 251 (1986).
